Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-2013
Public Counsel; reports; time; contents.

(1) In addition to whatever reports the Public Counsel may make from time to time, the Public Counsel shall no later than February 15 of each year report to the Clerk of the Legislature and to the Governor concerning the exercise of the Public Counsel's functions during the preceding calendar year. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. In discussing matters with which the Public Counsel has dealt, the Public Counsel need not identify those immediately concerned if to do so would cause needless hardship. If the annual report criticizes any named agencies or officials, the report must also include the replies of the named agencies or officials to such criticism. Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of such report by making a request for it to the Public Counsel.

(2) On or before December 15 of each year, the Public Counsel shall submit a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature as required under section 83-104 regarding state institutions.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 12, p. 2883;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 45;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 177;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,251;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 13.